Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 6
INDEMNIFICATION AND INSURANCE

11-103-601. Director and officer insurance and fidelity bonds - legislative declaration.

The directors of a state bank shall require good and sufficient fidelity bonds on all active officers and employees, whether or not they draw salary or compensation, which bonds shall provide for indemnity to such bank on account of any losses sustained by it as the result of any dishonest, fraudulent, or criminal conduct by them acting independently or in collusion or combination with any person. Such bonds may be in individual, schedule, or blanket form, and the premiums therefor shall be paid by the bank.

The said directors shall also require suitable insurance protection to the bank against burglary, robbery, theft, and other insurable hazard to which the bank may be exposed in the operations of its business on the premises or elsewhere.

The directors shall be responsible for prescribing, at least once in each calendar year, the amount or penal sum of the bonds and policies specified in this section and the sureties or underwriters thereon after giving due and careful consideration to all known elements and factors constituting such risk or hazard. Such action shall be recorded in the minutes of the board of directors.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the following is enforceable and in conformity with the public policy of this state, as expressed in this code, including the provisions of section 11-101-102:

Any insurance policy, form, contract, endorsement, or certificate in effect or issued on or after April 30, 1993, that provides insurance coverage to directors or officers, or both, of a bank but that does not grant coverage or that excludes coverage for claims made by any depository insurance organization or any other state or federal corporation, organization, or entity acting as receiver, conservator, or liquidator of such bank, whether in its own name or on behalf of any other person or entity; or

Any fidelity bond, financial institution bond, or depository institution bond in effect or issued on or after April 30, 1993, that provides for termination of such bond upon the taking over of the bank by a receiver or other liquidator or by state or federal officials.

No provision of part 8 of this article shall be construed to contravene or modify the expressed public policy set forth in this subsection (4).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1094, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-120 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-602. Indemnification and personal liability of directors, officers, employees, and agents.

A state bank has the same powers, rights, and obligations and is subject to the same limitations as apply to corporations for profit as set forth in article 109 of title 7. State bank directors, officers, employees, and agents have the same rights as directors, officers, employees, and agents, respectively, of corporations for profit as set forth in article 109 of title 7. State bank directors and officers have the benefit of the same limitations on personal liability for any injury to person or property arising out of a tort as set forth in section 7-108-403, for directors and officers, respectively, of corporations for profit. Any reference in said sections to shareholders shall be construed to refer to stockholders for the purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1095, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1966, § 69, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-121 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-603. Deposit insurance - membership in federal reserve system - federal national mortgage association.

A state bank is authorized to do any act necessary to obtain insurance of its deposits by the United States or any agency thereof and to acquire and hold membership in the federal reserve system or to take advantage of any other act or resolution of congress that may be enacted to aid, regulate, or safeguard state banks and their depositors, including any amendments of the same or any substitutions thereof. It may also subscribe for and acquire any stock, debentures, bonds, or other types of securities of the federal deposit insurance corporation and comply with the lawful regulations and requirements from time to time issued or made by such corporation.

A state bank that is a member of the federal reserve system, or of the federal deposit insurance corporation, or of both may make payments to the federal national mortgage association, a constituent agency of the national housing and home finance agency, of nonrefundable capital contributions, receive stock evidencing such capital contributions and hold and dispose thereof, contract with said association, and incur the expenses and otherwise comply with the then lawful regulations and requirements issued by said association from time to time to the extent a national bank in like circumstances is authorized by any act or resolution by the United States congress or by any lawful rule issued pursuant thereto.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1095, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-122 as it existed prior to 2003.